Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 23

Bonds Under City Manager-Commission Charter
[Repealed]

6-23-101 — 6-23-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 23, §§ 6-23-101 — 6-23-113 (Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 11, § 12; 1921, ch. 173, art. 14, §§ 1-5; 1921, ch. 173, art. 15, §§ 1-3; Code 1932, §§ 3589, 3603-3615; Shan. Supp., §§ 1997a191, 1997a205-1997a217; Acts 1968, ch. 427, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, §§ 4(37), 4(38); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-2301 — 6-2313), concerning bonds under city manager-commission charter, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 8.

Chapters 24-29

[Reserved]